Utah statutes.
78A-11-110.   Hearing.
(1) (a)  A hearing may be conducted before a quorum of the commission.
(b)  Any finding or order shall be made upon a majority vote of the quorum.
(2)  Alternatively, the commission may appoint three special masters, who are
judges of courts of record, to hear and take evidence in the matter and to
report to the commission.
(3) (a)  After the hearing or after considering the record and report of the
masters, if the commission finds by a preponderance of the evidence that
misconduct occurred, it shall order the reprimand, censure, suspension,
removal, or involuntary retirement of the judge.
(b)  When a commission order is sent to the Supreme Court, it shall also be:
(i)  publicly disclosed; and
(ii)  sent to the entity that appointed the judge.
(c)  In recommending any order, including stipulated orders, the commission
may not place, or attempt to place, any condition or limitation upon the
Supreme Court's constitutional power to:
(i)  review the commission's proceedings as to both law and fact; or
(ii)  implement, reject, or modify a commission order.
(4)  When the commission issues any order, including a stipulated order, that
is sent to the Supreme Court, the record shall include:
(a)  the original complaint and any other information regarding violations, or
potential violations, of the Code of Judicial Conduct;
(b)  the charges;
(c)  all correspondence and other documents which passed between the
commission and the judge;
(d)  all letters which may explain the charges;
(e)  all affidavits, subpoenas, and testimony of witnesses;
(f)  the commission's findings of fact and conclusions of law;
(g)  a transcript of any proceedings, including hearings on motions;
(h)  a copy of each exhibit admitted into evidence;
(i)  a summary of all the complaints dismissed by the commission against the
judge which contained allegations or information similar in nature to the
misconduct under review by the Supreme Court;
(j)  a summary of all the orders implemented, rejected, or modified by the
Supreme Court against the judge; and
(k)  all information in the commission's files on any informal resolution,
including any letter of admonition, comment, or caution, that the commission
issued against the judge prior to May 1, 2000.
